District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.11

Statutory construction.

The purposes of this chapter favor resolution of ambiguity by the hearing officer or a court toward the end of strengthening the legal rights of tenants or tenant organizations to the maximum extent permissible under law. If this chapter conflicts with another provision of law of general applicability, the provisions of this chapter control.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 511, 27 DCR 2975
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-27, § 2(h), 28 DCR 2824

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1661.